img/fsts/almalardan.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<pl%>
%<abl%>
%<nom%>

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N-INFL

%<n%>%<pl%>:лар CASES ;
%<n%>: CASES ;

LEXICON CASES

%<abl%>:дан # ;
%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns

алма:алма N-INFL ;
